Utah statutes.
72-3-107.   County executive to keep plats of roads and highways.
(1)  The county  executive of each county shall determine all county roads
existing in the county and prepare and keep current plats and specific
descriptions of the county roads.
(2) (a)  The plats and specific descriptions shall be kept on file in the
office of the county clerk or recorder.
(b)  A county clerk or recorder may not remove a platted road from the records
unless the legislative body has vacated the road after a public hearing in
accordance with Section 72-3-108.
